Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1803.01 to 38-1810.05 apply.

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 146;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,286;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 625;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 26.